Maryland, session 2025, HB0735.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0735*

HOUSE BILL 735
19–120.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Consolidation” and “merger” include increases and decreases in bed
capacity or services among the components of an organization that:
(i) Operates more than one health care facility; or
(ii) Operates one or more health care facilities and holds an
outstanding certificate of need to construct a health care facility.
(3) (i) “Health care service” means any clinically related patient
service.
(ii) “Health care service” includes a medical service.
(4) “Hospital capital threshold” means the lesser of:
(i) 25% of the hospital’s gross regulated charges for the immediately
preceding year; or
(ii) $50,000,000.
(5) “Limited service hospital” means a health care facility that:
(i) Is licensed as a hospital on or after January 1, 1999;
(ii) Changes the type or scope of health care services offered by
eliminating the facility’s capability to admit or retain patients for overnight hospitalization;
(iii) Retains an emergency or urgent care center; and
(iv) Complies with the regulations adopted by the Secretary under §
19–307.1 of this title.
(6) “Medical service” means:
(i) Any of the following categories of health care services:
1. Medicine, surgery, gynecology, addictions;
2. Obstetrics;
3. Pediatrics;

HOUSE BILL 735 3
4. [Psychiatry;
5.] Rehabilitation;
[6.] 5. Chronic care;
[7.] 6. Comprehensive care;
[8.] 7. Extended care;
[9.] 8. Intermediate care; or
[10.] 9. Residential treatment; or
(ii) Any subcategory of the rehabilitation, [psychiatry,]
comprehensive care, or intermediate care categories of health care services for which need
is projected in the State health plan.
(j) (1) A certificate of need is required before the type or scope of any health
care service is changed if the health care service:
(i) Is offered:
1. By a health care facility;
2. In space that is leased from a health care facility; or
3. In space that is on land leased from a health care facility;
or
(ii) Results in a change in operating room capacity in a hospital, a
freestanding medical facility, or an ambulatory surgical facility.
(2) This subsection does not apply if:
(i) The Commission adopts limits for changes in health care services
and the proposed change would not exceed those limits;
(ii) The proposed change and the annual operating revenue that
would result from the addition is entirely associated with the use of medical equipment;
(iii) The proposed change would establish, increase, or decrease a
health care service and the change would not result in the:
1. Establishment of a new medical service or elimination of
an existing medical service;

HOUSE BILL 735
2. Establishment of a cardiac surgery, organ transplant
surgery, or burn or neonatal intensive health care service;
3. Except as provided in § 19–120.1 of this subtitle,
establishment of percutaneous coronary intervention services;
4. Establishment of a home health program, hospice
program, or freestanding ambulatory surgical center or facility; or
5. Expansion of a comprehensive care, extended care,
intermediate care, residential treatment, [psychiatry,] or rehabilitation medical service,
except for an expansion related to an increase in total bed capacity in accordance with
subsection (h)(2)(i) of this section; or
(iv) 1. At least 45 days before increasing or decreasing the
volume of one or more health care services, written notice of intent to change the volume of
health care services is filed with the Commission;
2. The Commission in its sole discretion finds that the
proposed change:
A. Is pursuant to:
I. The consolidation or merger of two or more health care
facilities;
II. The conversion of a health care facility or part of a facility
to a nonhealth–related use;
III. The conversion of a hospital to a limited service hospital;
or
IV. The conversion of a licensed general hospital to a
freestanding medical facility in accordance with subsection (o)(3) of this section;
B. Is not inconsistent with the State health plan or the
institution–specific plan developed and adopted by the Commission;
C. Will result in the delivery of more efficient and effective
health care services; and
D. Is in the public interest; and
3. Within 45 days of receiving notice under item 1 of this
item, the Commission notifies the health care facility of its finding.

HOUSE BILL 735 5
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, a
certificate of need is required:
(i) Before an additional home health agency, branch office, or home
health care service is established by an existing health care agency or facility;
(ii) Before an existing home health agency or health care facility
establishes a home health agency or home health care service at a location in the service
area not included under a previous certificate of need or license;
(iii) Before a transfer of ownership of any branch office of a home
health agency or home health care service of an existing health care facility that separates
the ownership of the branch office from the home health agency or home health care service
of an existing health care facility which established the branch office; or
(iv) Before the expansion of a home health service or program by a
health care facility that:
1. Established the home health service or program without a
certificate of need between January 1, 1984, and July 1, 1984; and
2. During a 1–year period, the annual operating revenue of
the home health service or program would be greater than $333,000 after an annual
adjustment for inflation, based on an appropriate index specified by the Commission.
19–122.1.
NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, A CERTIFICATE OF NEED
IS NOT REQUIRED TO:
(1) ESTABLISH OR OPERATE A PSYCHIATRIC HEALTH CARE FACILITY;
OR
(2) OFFER PSYCHIATRIC OR OTHER MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES AT A
HEALTH CARE FACILITY, REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE HEALTH CARE FACILITY
REQUIRES A CERTIFICATE OF NEED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.